Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1199.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1101(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1101. Imposition of Tax.--(a) General Rule.--Every pipeline company, conduit company, steamboat company, canal company, slack water navigation company, transportation company, and every other company, association, joint-stock association, or limited partnership, now or hereafter incorporated or organized by or under any law of this Commonwealth, or now or 12345678910111213141516171819202122 hereafter organized or incorporated by any other state or by the United States or any foreign government, and doing business in this Commonwealth, and every copartnership, person or persons owing, operating or leasing to or from another corporation, company, association, joint-stock association, limited partnership, copartnership, person or persons, any pipeline, conduit, steamboat, canal, slack water navigation, or other device for the transportation of freight, passengers, baggage, or oil, except motor vehicles and railroads, and every limited partnership, association, joint-stock association, corporation or company engaged in, or hereinafter engaged in, the transportation of freight or oil within this State, and every telephone company, telegraph company or provider of mobile telecommunications services now or hereafter incorporated or organized by or under any law of this Commonwealth, or now or hereafter organized or incorporated by any other state or by the United States or any foreign government and doing business in this Commonwealth, and every limited partnership, association, joint-stock association, copartnership, person or persons, engaged in telephone or telegraph business or providing mobile telecommunications services in this Commonwealth, and every limited partnership, association, joint-stock association, corporation or company providing digital advertising services in this Commonwealth, shall pay to the State Treasurer, through the Department of Revenue, a tax of forty-five mills with a surtax equal to five mills upon each dollar of the gross receipts of the corporation, company or association, limited partnership, joint-stock association, copartnership, person or persons received from:(1) passengers, baggage, oil and freight transported wholly 20260SB1199PN1471 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within this State;(2) telegraph or telephone messages transmitted wholly within this State and telegraph or telephone messages transmitted in interstate commerce where such messages originate or terminate in this State and the charges for such messages are billed to a service address in this State, except gross receipts derived from:(i) the sales of access to the Internet, as set forth in Article II, made to the ultimate consumer;(ii) the sales for resale to persons, partnerships, associations, corporations, or political subdivisions subject to the tax imposed by this article upon gross receipts derived from such resale of telecommunications services, including:(A) telecommunications exchange access to interconnect with a local exchange carrier's network;(B) network elements on an unbundled basis; and(C) sales of telecommunications services to interconnect with providers of mobile telecommunications services; and(iii) the sales of telephones, telephone handsets, modems, tablets and related accessories, including cases, chargers, holsters, clips, hands-free devices, screen protectors and batteries; [and](3) mobile telecommunications services messages sourced to this Commonwealth based on the place of primary use standard set forth in the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act (4 U.S.C. § 117), except gross receipts derived from:(i) the sales of access to the Internet, as set forth in Article II, made to the ultimate consumer;(ii) the sales for resale to persons, partnerships, associations, corporations or political subdivisions subject to 20260SB1199PN1471 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the tax imposed by this article upon gross receipts derived from such resale of mobile telecommunications services, including sales of mobile telecommunications services to interconnect with providers of telecommunications services; and(iii) the sales of telephones, telephone handsets, modems, tablets and related accessories, including cases, chargers, holsters, clips, hands-free devices, screen protectors and batteries[.]; and(4) digital advertising services displayed to a user on a digital interface wholly within this Commonwealth, including banner advertising, search engine advertising, interstitial advertising and comparable advertising services that utilize the personal information of the users to whom the advertisements are served. As used in this clause, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this clause:"D igital advertising services." The provision of advertisements displayed on a digital interface."Digital interface." Any software, including an Internet website, part of an Internet website or application, accessible to a user."User." An individual or other person accessing a digital interface via a device.* * *(g.1) Exemption for Broadcast and News Media Entities.--The tax imposed under this section on gross receipts derived from digital advertising services shall not however be imposed on gross receipts from advertising services displayed on a digital interface owned or operated by a broadcast entity or news media entity. As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20260SB1199PN1471 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection:"B roadcast entity." An entity primarily engaged in operating a broadcast television or radio station."Digital advertising services." As defined in subsection (a)(4)."Digital interface." As defined in subsection (a)(4)."News media entity." An entity primarily engaged in newsgathering, reporting or publishing articles or commentary on news, current events, culture or other matters of public interest.* * *Section 2. The amendment of section 1101(a) of the act shall apply to the taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1199PN1471 - 5 - 1234567891011121314